Utah statutes.
76-7-306.   Physician, hospital employee, or hospital not required to
participate in abortion.
(1)  A physician, or any other person who is a member of or associated with
the staff of a hospital, or any employee of a hospital in which an abortion
has been authorized, who states an objection to an abortion or the practice of
abortion in general on moral or religious grounds shall not be required to
participate in the medical procedures which will result in the abortion, and
the refusal of any person to participate shall not form the basis of any claim
for damages on account of the refusal or for any disciplinary or recriminatory
action against such person, nor shall any moral or religious scruples or
objections to abortions be the grounds for any discrimination in hiring in
this state.
(2)  Nothing in this part shall require any private and/or denominational
hospital to admit any patient for the purpose of performing an abortion.
